Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-656
Roadway, defined.

Roadway shall mean that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, exclusive of the berm or shoulder. If a highway includes two or more separate roadways, the term roadway shall refer to any such roadway separately but not to all such roadways collectively.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 152.